Utah statutes.
Part 2.  Commission Creation and Membership

63C-14-201.   Creation of Federal Funds Commission -- Membership -- Chairs.

(1)  There is created an advisory commission known as the Federal Funds Commission.

(2)  The commission consists of 13 members as follows:

(a)  three members of the Senate, appointed by the president of the Senate, no more than two of whom may be from the same political party;

(b)  three members of the House of Representatives, appointed by the speaker of the House of Representatives, no more than two of whom may be from the same political party;

(c)  three individuals appointed by the governor, no more than two of whom may be from the same political party; and

(d)  four individuals appointed by commission members appointed under Subsections (2)(a), (b), and (c).

(3)  The commission shall select a chair and a vice chair from among its members.



Enacted by Chapter 62, 2013 General Session

